Utah statutes.
26-10-7.   Dental health programs -- Appointment of director.
The department shall establish and promote programs to protect and improve the
dental health of the public. The executive director shall appoint a director
of the dental health program who shall be a dentist licensed in the state with
at least one year of training in an accredited school of public health or not
less than two years of experience in public health dentistry.
